Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201179-1005.01
Tax
Commissioner; certify data; department; calculate allocation percentage and
local system's allocated income tax funds.

(1) An amount equal to the amount appropriated to the School
District Income Tax Fund for distribution in school fiscal year 1992-93 shall
be disbursed as option payments as determined under section 79-1009 and as
allocated income tax funds as determined in this section and sections 79-1008.01,
79-1015.01, 79-1017.01, and 79-1018.01, except as provided in section 79-1008.02.
Funds not distributed as allocated income tax funds due to minimum levy adjustments
shall not increase the amount available to local systems for distribution
as allocated income tax funds.

(2) Not later than November 15 of each year, the Tax Commissioner
shall certify to the department for the preceding tax year the income tax
liability of resident individuals for each local system. The 1996 income tax
liability of resident individuals of Class I districts that are affiliated
with multiple high school districts shall be divided between local systems
based on the percentage of the Class I district's valuation affiliated with
each high school district.

(3) Using the data certified by the Tax Commissioner pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section,
the department shall calculate the allocation percentage and each local system's
allocated income tax funds. The allocation percentage shall be an amount equal
to the amount appropriated to the School District Income Tax Fund for distribution
in school fiscal year 1992-93 minus the total amount paid for option students
pursuant to section 79-1009 and (a) for aid calculated for
school fiscal year 2010-11, minus twenty million dollars and (b) for aid calculated for school fiscal years 2011-12
and 2012-13, minus twenty-one million dollars with the difference
divided by the aggregate statewide income tax liability of all resident individuals
certified pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
Each local system's allocated income tax funds shall be calculated by multiplying
the allocation percentage times the local system's income tax liability certified
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 33;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 16;

Laws 1999, LB 149, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 898, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 1093, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 11;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB5, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB235, § 7.